Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Hospital and Nursing Home Licensure and Inspection.
§ 32.1-137.05.
(Effective until July 1, 2023) Advance estimate of patient payment amount for elective procedure, test, or service.

Every hospital shall, upon request of a patient scheduled to receive an elective procedure, test, or service to be performed by the hospital, or upon request of such patient’s legally authorized representative, made no less than three days in advance of the date on which such elective procedure, test, or service is scheduled to be performed, furnish the patient with an estimate of the payment amount for which the participant will be responsible for such elective procedure, test, or service. Every hospital shall provide written information about the patient’s ability to request an estimate of the payment amount pursuant to this section. Such written information shall be posted conspicuously in public areas of the hospital, including admissions or registration areas, and included on any website maintained by the hospital.

History.

2016, c. 448; 2019, cc. 670, 671.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 670 and 671 are nearly identical, and added the second and third sentences. The section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 32.1-137.05.
(Effective July 1, 2023) Information regarding standard charges; advance estimate of patient payment amount for elective procedure, test, or service.

Every hospital shall make available to the public on its website a machine-readable file containing a list of all standard charges for all items and services provided by the hospital in accordance with 45 C.F.R. § 180.50, as amended. As used in this subsection, “hospital,” “items and services,” “machine-readable,” and “standard charge” have the same meaning as set forth in 45 C.F.R. § 180.20.

Every hospital shall, upon request of a patient scheduled to receive an elective procedure, test, or service to be performed by the hospital, or upon request of such patient’s legally authorized representative, made no less than three days in advance of the date on which such elective procedure, test, or service is scheduled to be performed, furnish the patient with an estimate of the payment amount for which the participant will be responsible for such elective procedure, test, or service. Every hospital shall provide written information about the patient’s ability to request an estimate of the payment amount pursuant to this section. Such written information shall be posted conspicuously in public areas of the hospital, including admissions or registration areas, and included on any website maintained by the hospital.

History.

2016, c. 448; 2019, cc. 670, 671; 2022, c. 297.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 297, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2023.”

Act 2022, c. 297, cl. 3 provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall develop recommendations for implementation of this act, including any regulatory changes that may be necessary for implementation of this act, and shall report his recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by November 1, 2022.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 297, effective July 1, 2023, added subsection A and added the subsection B designation.

§ 32.1-137.06.
Lyme disease test result information.

Every laboratory reporting the results of a test for Lyme disease ordered in an office-based setting by a health care provider shall include a notice to be provided together with such test results when such test results are reported to the health care provider that states: PATIENTS UNDERGOING A LYME DISEASE TEST SHOULD BE AWARE THAT LYME DISEASE TESTS VARY AND MAY PRODUCE RESULTS THAT ARE INACCURATE. THIS MEANS A PATIENT MAY NOT BE ABLE TO RELY ON A POSITIVE OR NEGATIVE RESULT. HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS ARE ENCOURAGED TO DISCUSS LYME DISEASE TEST RESULTS WITH THE PATIENT FOR WHOM THE TEST WAS ORDERED.

A laboratory that complies with this section shall be immune from civil liability absent gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

2019, c. 435.

§ 32.1-137.07.
Violations of certain provisions; penalty.

If the Commissioner receives a report from the State Corporation Commission that a medical care facility has engaged in a pattern of violations pursuant to §

38.2-3445.01

and the report is substantiated after investigation, the Commissioner may levy a fine upon the medical care facility in an amount not to exceed $1,000 per violation and may take other formal or informal disciplinary action as permitted under this chapter.

History.

2020, cc. 1080, 1081.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1080 and 1081, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1080 and 1081, cl. 7 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall contract with the nonprofit data services organization to establish a data set and business process in accordance with §

38.2-3445.03

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act. Such data set and business protocols shall be (i) developed in collaboration with health carriers and health care providers, (ii) reviewed by the advisory committee established pursuant to §

32.1-276.7:1

of the Code of Virginia, and (iii) available beginning November 1, 2020.”

§ 32.1-137.08.
Medical care facilities; persons with disabilities; designated support persons.

As used in this section:“Activity of daily living” means a personal care task such as bathing, dressing, toileting, transferring, and eating or feeding.“Admission” means (i) with regard to a medical care facility that is a hospital or hospice facility, accepting a person for (a) bed occupancy and care that is anticipated to span at least two midnights or (b) observation and (ii) with regard to a medical care facility that is an outpatient surgical hospital, accepting a person for care, irrespective of anticipated length of care.“Care provider” means any person or entity responsible for the care of a person with a disability prior to admission of the person with a disability to a medical facility.“Designated support person” means a person who is 18 years of age or older; knowledgeable about the needs of a person with a disability; and designated, orally or in writing, by the person with a disability or his guardian, authorized representative, or care provider to provide support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability to the person with a disability at any time during which health care services are provided.“Medical care facility” means a hospital licensed pursuant to this article that provides inpatient care, other than a hospital that is certified as a long-term acute care hospital or specialty rehabilitation hospital; an outpatient surgical hospital licensed or certified pursuant to this article; a hospice facility licensed pursuant to Article 7 (§

32.1-162.1

et seq.); and any institution exempt from licensure pursuant to clause (vi) of §

32.1-124

.“Person with a disability” means a person who, prior to admission to a medical care facility, had a physical, sensory, mental, or emotional impairment that substantially limits one or more activities of daily living or has a record of such impairment.“Support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability” means support and assistance, including assistance with activities of daily living, communication, decision-making, and other supports, that is (i) necessary due to the absence, loss, diminution, or impairment of a physical, sensory, behavioral, cognitive, or emotional function of the person due to the specifics of his disability; (ii) provided by a designated support person; (iii) ongoing; and (iv) necessary for the care of, and to afford meaningful access to health care for, the person with a disability.

Every medical care facility shall allow a person with a disability who requires support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability to be accompanied by a designated support person who will provide support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability to the person with a disability during an admission. In any case in which the duration of the admission lasts more than 24 hours, the person with a disability may designate more than one designated support person. However, no medical care facility shall be required to allow more than one designated support person to be present with a person with a disability at any time.

A designated support person is not a visitor and shall not be subject to any restrictions on visitation adopted by a medical care facility. However, such designated support person may be required to comply with all reasonable requirements of the medical care facility adopted to protect the health and safety of the person with a disability; the designated support person; the staff and other patients of, or visitors to, the medical care facility; and the public. A medical care facility may restrict a designated support person’s access to specified areas of and movement on the premises of the medical care facility when such restrictions are determined by the medical care facility to be reasonably necessary to protect the health and safety of the person with a disability; the designated support person; the staff and other patients of, or visitors to, the medical care facility; and the public.

A medical care facility may request that a person with a disability provide documentation indicating that he is a person with a disability and, if the person fails, refuses, or is unable to provide such documentation, perform an objective assessment of the person to determine whether he is a person with a disability; however, the failure of a hospital to perform such objective assessment shall not constitute grounds for prohibiting a designated support person from accompanying a person with a disability for the purpose of providing support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability.

Every medical care facility shall (i) establish protocols to inform patients, at the time of admission, of the right of a person with a disability who requires support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability to be accompanied by a designated support person for the purpose of providing support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability and (ii) develop and make available to a patient, the patient’s guardian, the patient’s authorized representative, or the person’s care provider upon request of the patient, guardian, authorized representative, or care provider written information regarding the right of a person with a disability who requires support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability to be accompanied by a designated support person and policies related thereto. Every medical care facility shall also make such written information available to the public on its website.

The Department shall develop and make available on its website information for the public regarding (i) the right of a person with a disability who requires support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability to be accompanied by a designated support person who will provide support and assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability to the person with a disability during an admission and (ii) the requirements of this section.

Nothing in this section shall alter the obligation of a medical care facility to provide patients with effective communication support or other required services, regardless of the presence of a designated support person or other reasonable accommodation, consistent with applicable federal or state law or regulations.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to (i) prevent a medical care facility from complying, or interfere with the ability of a medical care facility to comply, with or cause a medical care facility to violate any federal or state law or regulation, (ii) deem a designated support person to be acting under the direction or control of the medical care facility or as an agent of the medical care facility, or (iii) require any medical care facility to allow a designated support person to perform any action or provide any support or assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability when the medical care facility reasonably determines that the performance of such action or provision of such support or assistance necessary due to the specifics of the person’s disability would be medically or therapeutically contraindicated or would pose a threat to the health and safety of the person with a disability; the designated support person; or the staff or other patients of, or visitors to, the medical care facility.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 220.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 220, cl. 3, effective March 18, 2021, provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Effective date.

This section is effective March 18, 2021, by emergency.

§ 32.1-137.09.
Hospital emergency department CPT code data reporting.

Every hospital in the Commonwealth that includes an emergency department shall report quarterly to the Department, for the preceding quarter, (i) the total number of visits to the hospital’s emergency department, by location, and (ii) the total number of visits to the hospital’s emergency department by emergency department evaluation and management (E/M) Physicians’ Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) code.

The Department shall annually publish a report setting forth the average number of hospital emergency department visits by location and by emergency department E/M CPT code statewide and by region for each month.

The Department may enter into a contract or agreement with the nonprofit organization with which the Department has entered into a contract or agreement pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

for the compilation, storage, analysis, and evaluation of data required to be submitted pursuant to this section.

History.

2022, c. 342.

§ 32.1-137.010.
Financial assistance; payment plans.

As used in this section:

“Patient”
means any adult who receives medical services from a hospital or, in the case of a minor who receives medical services from a hospital, the financially responsible party for such minor.

“Uninsured patient”
means a patient who does not have any health insurance, third-party assistance, medical savings account, or claims against third parties covered by insurance, is not covered under workers’ compensation, a health benefit plan as defined in §

38.2-3438

, or an employee welfare benefit plan as defined in § 3(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or does not receive benefits under Title XVIII or XIX of the Social Security Act or 10 U.S.C. § 1071 et seq. or any other form of coverage from private insurance or federal, state, or local government medical assistance programs.

Every hospital shall make reasonable efforts to screen every uninsured patient to determine whether the individual is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to the state plan for medical assistance or for financial assistance under the hospital’s financial assistance policy.

Every hospital shall inform every uninsured patient who receives services at the hospital and who is determined to be eligible for assistance under the hospital’s financial assistance policy of the option to enter into a payment plan with the hospital. A payment plan entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be provided to the patient in writing or electronically and shall provide for repayment of the cumulative amount owed to the hospital. The amount of monthly payments and the term of the payment plan shall be determined based upon the patient’s ability to pay. Any interest on amounts owed pursuant to the payment plan shall not exceed the maximum judgment rate of interest pursuant to §

6.2-302

. The hospital shall not charge any fees related to the payment plan. The payment plan shall allow prepayment of amounts owed without penalty.

Every hospital shall develop a process by which either an uninsured patient who agrees to a payment plan pursuant to subsection C or the hospital may request and shall be granted the opportunity to renegotiate such payment plan. Such renegotiation shall include opportunity for a new screening in accordance with subdivision B. No hospital shall charge any fees for renegotiation of a payment plan pursuant to this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no hospital shall engage in any action described in § 501(r)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code as it was in effect on January 1, 2020, to recover a debt for medical services against any patient unless the hospital has made all reasonable efforts to determine whether the patient qualifies for medical assistance pursuant to the state plan for medical assistance or is eligible for financial assistance under the hospital’s financial assistance policy.

Every hospital shall include in written information required pursuant to §

32.1-137.01

information about the availability of a payment plan for the payment of debt owed to the hospital pursuant to subsection C and the renegotiation process described in subsection D.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Prohibit a hospital, as part of its financial assistance policy, from requiring a patient to (i) provide necessary information needed to determine eligibility for financial assistance under the hospital’s financial assistance policy, medical assistance pursuant to Title XVIII or XIX of the Social Security Act or 10 U.S.C. § 1071 et seq., or other programs of insurance or (ii) undertake good faith efforts to apply for and enroll in such programs of insurance for which the patient may be eligible as a condition of awarding financial assistance;

Require a hospital to grant or continue to grant any financial assistance or payment plan pursuant to this section when (i) a patient has provided false, inaccurate, or incomplete information required for determining eligibility for such hospital’s financial assistance policy or (ii) a patient has not undertaken good faith efforts to comply with any payment plan pursuant to this section; or

Prohibit the coordination of benefits as required by state or federal law.

History.

2022, cc. 679, 678.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2022 acts having been §

32.1-137.09

.